Alaska statutes. Title 2. Aeronautics.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1988 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982 and in 1988, 1998, 2010, and 2018 to make other minor word changes.

In 1977, “Department of Transportation and Public Facilities” was substituted for “Department of Public Works” in several sections to implement E.O. No. 39 § 11 (1977).

Cross references. —

For the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, see AS 44.42.